Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.902

Servicing and management of projects in effect before July 1, 2007.

(1) Energy freedom program projects funded pursuant to *RCW 43.325.040 or by the legislature pursuant to sections 191 and 192, chapter 371, Laws of 2006 for which the department of agriculture has signed loan agreements and disbursed funds prior to June 30, 2007, shall continue to be serviced by the department of agriculture.

(2) Energy freedom program projects funded pursuant to *RCW 43.325.040 or by the legislature pursuant to sections 191 and 192, chapter 371, Laws of 2006 for which moneys have been appropriated but loan agreements or disbursements have not been completed must be transferred to the department for project management on July 1, 2007, subject to the ongoing requirements of the energy freedom program.

[ 2007 c 348 s 307.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.325.040 expired June 30, 2016.